New Jersey, session 221, S4525.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2009, c.8 (C.45:28-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: Propulsion battery means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2023, c.222 (C.13:1E-99.81b) and shall include any other battery that could pose an environmental danger, as determined by the Attorney General. "Scrap metal" means used, discarded, or previously owned items that consist predominantly of ferrous metals, aluminum, brass, copper, lead, chromium, tin, nickel, or alloys, and shall include a used catalytic converter, in whole or in part, if the used catalytic converter is not attached to a motor vehicle. "Scrap metal business" means a commercial establishment which, as one of its principal business purposes, purchases scrap metal for purposes of resale or processing. (cf: P.L.2023, c.56, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2009, c.8 (C.45:28-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The operator of a scrap metal business shall: a.    Verify the identity of any person delivering or selling scrap metal to the scrap metal business by requesting and examining a photograph-bearing, valid State or federal driver's license or other government-issued form of identification bearing a photograph; b.    Make a clear copy of, and record, in a manner as may be prescribed by the Attorney General, the number of the driver's license or other government-issued form of identification presented by the person delivering or selling the scrap metal, before receiving or purchasing any scrap metal from that person; c.    Maintain, for at least five years, a record of all receipts or purchases of scrap metal in excess of 100 pounds or $50, whichever is less, including, but not limited to: (1) the date of receipt or purchase of the scrap metal; (2) the name and address of the person delivering or selling the scrap metal; (3) the type and number of the identification presented by the person delivering or selling the scrap metal, along with a copy of the driver's license or other government-issued form of identification; (4) a description of the scrap metal received or purchased, including, but not limited to its type, amount, and form; (5) the signature of the person delivering or selling the scrap metal; (6) for a used catalytic converter, in whole or in part, that is not attached to a motor vehicle at the time of sale or attempted sale, unless the seller is a registered business that, in the regular course of business, collects, stores, or sells a used catalytic converter or any other motor vehicle part: (a) the Vehicle Identification Number of the motor vehicle from which the catalytic converter was taken; and (b) a copy of the certificate of title or registration, a receipt from a transaction of repair, or a bill of sale for the motor vehicle from which the catalytic converter was taken; and (7) any other information as may be required by the Attorney General; d.    Make any records maintained pursuant to subsection c. of this section available, upon request, to any law enforcement agency or official investigating the possible theft or resale of scrap metals; [and] e.    Purchase or attempt to purchase only from a person delivering or selling scrap metal who provides the information required pursuant to this section; f.     Require a person delivering or selling scrap metal to the scrap metal business to disclose in writing, to the best of the persons knowledge, whether the scrap metal contains a propulsion battery before the scrap metal business receives or purchases the scrap metal from that person; g.    If a disclosure made by a person delivering or selling scrap metal indicates the scrap metal does not contain a propulsion battery, inspect the scrap metal to confirm that the scrap metal does not contain a propulsion battery before receiving or purchasing the scrap metal from that person; and h.    Maintain, for at least five years and in a manner as may be prescribed by the Attorney General, a record of all propulsion battery disclosures for scrap metal received or purchased by the scrap metal business and a record of the inspection of scrap metal received or purchased by the scrap metal business if the disclosure made by the person delivering or selling the scrap metal indicates the scrap metal does not contain a propulsion battery. (cf: P.L.2023, c.56, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment, except that the Attorney General may take any anticipatory administrative action as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.